Indiana, session 2026, HB1201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-1-23.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 23.5. Use of Artificial Intelligence Systems
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "artificial intelligence system"
means a machine based system that, for explicit or implicit
objectives, infers from the input it receives how to generate
outputs, including:
(1) predictions;
(2) content;
(3) recommendations; or
(4) decisions;
that can influence physical or virtual environments. The term
includes generative artificial intelligence.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "board" means any of the
following:
(1) The behavioral health and human services licensing board.
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


(2) The state psychology board.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "generative artificial
intelligence" means an automated computing system that, when
prompted with human prompts, descriptions, or queries, can
produce outputs that simulate human product content, including:
(1) textual outputs, such as short answers, essays, poetry, or
longer compositions or answers;
(2) image outputs, such as fine art, photographs, conceptual
art, diagrams, and other images;
(3) multimedia outputs, such as audio or video in the form of
compositions, songs, or short-form or long-form audio or
video; and
(4) other content that would otherwise be produced by human
means.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "licensed mental health
professional" means an individual who holds an unlimited license
to practice as any of the following in Indiana:
(1) Any behavioral health and human services professional
licensed under IC 25-23.6.
(2) A psychologist licensed under IC 25-33.
Sec. 5. A person or entity may not use an artificial intelligence
system to:
(1) impersonate; or
(2) act as a substitute for;
a licensed mental health professional during any interaction that
is required to be performed by the licensed mental health
professional.
Sec. 6. A licensed mental health professional who violates this
chapter is subject to disciplinary action under IC 25-1-9.
Sec. 7. If a board finds that a person or an entity violates section
5 of this chapter, the board may impose a civil penalty of not more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. Penalties
collected under this section must be deposited in the state general
fund.
SECTION 2. IC 27-1-37-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.215-2025,
SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The department shall do the following:
(1) Require health carriers to meet network adequacy standards
that are no less stringent than the network adequacy standards
established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) When assessing whether a health carrier has met the network
adequacy standards, consider the availability and variety of
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


independent specialty providers that provide services within in
network provider facilities in the health carrier's network.
(3) Contract with an objective third party to verify that health
carriers are in compliance with the network adequacy
standards.
SECTION 3. IC 27-1-37.1-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person who enters
into a health provider contract with a provider shall provide written
notice to the provider of any amendment to the health provider contract
not less than forty-five (45) sixty (60) days before the proposed
effective date of the amendment.
SECTION 4. IC 27-1-37.1-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. Before an amendment to a
health provider contract that:
(1) makes a material change; or
(2) reduces the reimbursement rate for any CPT code (as
defined in IC 27-8-5.7-2.5);
goes into effect, a person shall obtain the provider's approval of the
amendment and the provider's signature.
SECTION 5. IC 27-1-52.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 52.1. Downcoding of Health Benefits Claims
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "covered individual" means an
individual who is entitled to coverage under a health plan.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "downcoding" means the
adjustment of a health benefits claim by an insurer to a less
complex or lower cost service to reimburse a provider in an
amount less than the required amount under the provider contract.
The term includes the use of remark codes.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "health benefits claim" means a
claim submitted by a provider for payment under a health plan for
health care services provided to a covered individual.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "health plan" means the
following:
(1) A policy of accident and sickness insurance (as defined in
IC 27-8-5-1), but not including the coverages described in
IC 27-8-5-2.5(a).
(2) An individual contract (as defined in IC 27-13-1-21) or a
group contract (as defined in IC 27-13-1-16) with a health
maintenance organization (as defined in IC 27-13-1-19) that
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


provides coverage for basic health care services (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-4).
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "insurer" means the following:
(1) An insurer (as defined in IC 27-1-2-3(x)) that issues a
policy of accident and sickness insurance (as defined in
IC 27-8-5-1), but not including the coverages described in
IC 27-8-5-2.5(a).
(2) A health maintenance organization (as defined in
IC 27-13-1-19) that provides coverage for basic health care
services (as defined in IC 27-13-1-4) under an individual
contract (as defined in IC 27-13-1-21) or a group contract (as
defined in IC 27-13-1-16).
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "provider" means an individual
or entity licensed or legally authorized to provide health care
services.
Sec. 7. Notwithstanding any other law or regulation to the
contrary, an insurer may not use downcoding in a manner that
prevents a provider from:
(1) submitting a health benefits claim for the actual service
performed; and
(2) collecting reimbursement from the insurer for the actual
service performed.
Sec. 8. The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
carry out this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 27-8-5-15.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.103-2020,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.8. (a) As used in this section, "treatment of a
mental illness or substance abuse" means:
(1) treatment for a mental illness, as defined in IC 12-7-2-130(1);
and
(2) treatment for drug abuse or alcohol abuse.
(b) As used in this section, "act" refers to the Paul Wellstone and
Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Act of 2008 and
any amendments thereto, plus any federal guidance or regulations
relevant to that act, including 45 CFR 146.136, 45 CFR 147.136, 45
CFR 147.160, and 45 CFR 156.115(a)(3).
(c) As used in this section, "nonquantitative treatment limitations"
refers to those limitations described in 26 CFR 54.9812-1, 29 CFR
2590.712, and 45 CFR 146.136.
(d) An insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance that provides coverage of services for treatment of a mental
illness or substance abuse shall submit a report to the department not
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


later than December 31 of each year that contains the following
information:
(1) A description of the processes:
(A) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of other medical or surgical
conditions.
(2) Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations that
are applied to:
(A) coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) coverage of services for treatment of other medical or
surgical conditions;
within each classification of benefits.
(3) The reimbursement rates for providers of mental illness or
substance abuse services relative to Medicare rates and the
reimbursement rates for providers of medical or surgical
services relative to Medicare rates in the respective
classification of benefits.
(e) There may be no separate nonquantitative treatment limitations
that apply to coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse that do not apply to coverage of services for treatment
of other medical or surgical conditions within any classification of
benefits.
(f) An insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness insurance
that provides coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse shall also submit an analysis showing the insurer's
compliance with this section and the act to the department not later
than December 31 of each year. The analysis must do the following:
(1) Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative
treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that
were considered but rejected.
(2) Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to
define the factors and any other evidence relied upon in designing
each nonquantitative treatment limitation.
(3) Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the
analyses, performed to determine the following:
(A) That the processes and strategies used to design each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for coverage of services
for treatment of a mental illness or substance abuse are
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


comparable to, and applied no more stringently than, the
processes and strategies used to design each nonquantitative
treatment limitation for coverage of services for treatment of
other medical or surgical conditions.
(B) That the processes and strategies used to apply each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for treatment of a mental
illness or substance abuse are comparable to, and applied no
more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to
apply each nonquantitative limitation for treatment of other
medical or surgical conditions.
(g) This subsection applies to a policy of accident and sickness
insurance that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June
30, 2026. An insurer that issues a policy of accident and sickness
insurance that provides coverage of services for treatment of a
mental illness or substance abuse shall reimburse providers of
mental illness or substance abuse services at rates that are at least
as favorable relative to Medicare rates as reimbursement rates are
for providers of medical or surgical services relative to Medicare
rates in the respective classification of benefits.
(g) (h) The department shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with
this section and the applicable provisions of the act.
SECTION 7. IC 27-8-5.7-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. Section 6.7 of this chapter, as
added in the 2026 session of the general assembly, and section 10
of this chapter, as amended in the 2026 session of the general
assembly, apply to an accident and sickness insurance policy that
is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 8. IC 27-8-5.7-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. (a) An insurer may not
retroactively reduce the reimbursement rate for any CPT code.
(b) An insurer:
(1) shall provide at least sixty (60) days notice to a provider;
and
(2) must obtain the approval and signature of a provider in
accordance with IC 27-1-37.1-5.5;
before implementing a rate reduction for any CPT code.
SECTION 9. IC 27-8-5.7-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.55-2006,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) An insurer may not, more than two (2)
years after the date on which an overpayment on a provider claim was
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


made to the provider by the insurer:
(1) request that the provider repay the overpayment; or
(2) adjust a subsequent claim filed by the provider as a method of
obtaining reimbursement of the overpayment from the provider.
(a) An insurer may not retroactively audit a paid claim or seek
recoupment or a refund of a paid claim more than:
(1) one hundred eighty (180) days after the date on which the
claim was initially paid; or
(2) the same number of days that a provider is required to
submit a claim to the insurer;
whichever occurs first.
(b) An insurer may not be required to correct a payment error to a
provider more than two (2) years after the date on which a payment on
a provider claim was made to the provider by the insurer. period
described in subsection (a).
(c) This section does not apply in cases of fraud by the provider, the
insured, or the insurer with respect to the claim on which the
overpayment or underpayment was made.
SECTION 10. IC 27-8-11-15 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) This section applies if:
(1) an insurer provides coverage for mental and behavioral
care services;
(2) network access to the mental and behavioral care services
does not meet reasonable appointment wait time standards;
and
(3) the insured receives care from an out of network provider.
(b) The insured's treating provider may collect from the insured
only the deductible or copayment, if any, that the insured would be
responsible to pay if the mental and behavioral care services had
been provided by a provider with which the insurer has entered
into an agreement under section 3 of this chapter.
(c) The insured may not be billed by the insurer or by the out of
network provider for any difference between the out of network
provider's charge and the amount paid by the insurer to the out of
network provider.
SECTION 11. IC 27-13-7-14.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.103-2020,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.2. (a) As used in this section, "treatment of a
mental illness or substance abuse" means:
(1) treatment for a mental illness, as defined in IC 12-7-2-130(1);
and
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


(2) treatment for drug abuse or alcohol abuse.
(b) As used in this section, "act" refers to the Paul Wellstone and
Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Act of 2008 and
any amendments thereto, plus any federal guidance or regulations
relevant to that act, including 45 CFR 146.136, 45 CFR 147.136, 45
CFR 147.160, and 45 CFR 156.115(a)(3).
(c) As used in this section, "nonquantitative treatment limitations"
refers to those limitations described in 26 CFR 54.9812-1, 29 CFR
2590.712, and 45 CFR 146.136.
(d) An individual contract or a group contract that provides
coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or substance
abuse shall submit a report to the department not later than December
31 of each year that contains the following information:
(1) A description of the processes:
(A) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for
coverage of services for treatment of other medical or surgical
conditions.
(2) Identification of all nonquantitative treatment limitations that
are applied to:
(A) coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse; and
(B) coverage of services for treatment of other medical or
surgical conditions;
within each classification of benefits.
(3) The reimbursement rates for providers of mental illness or
substance abuse services relative to Medicare rates and the
reimbursement rates for providers of medical or surgical
services relative to Medicare rates in the respective
classification of benefits.
(e) There may be no separate nonquantitative treatment limitations
that apply to coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse that do not apply to coverage of services for treatment
of other medical or surgical conditions within any classification of
benefits.
(f) An individual contract or a group contract that provides coverage
of services for treatment of a mental illness or substance abuse shall
also submit an analysis showing the insurer's compliance with this
section and the act to the department not later than December 31 of
each year. The analysis must do the following:
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


(1) Identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative
treatment limitation will apply to a benefit, including factors that
were considered but rejected.
(2) Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to
define the factors and any other evidence relied upon in designing
each nonquantitative treatment limitation.
(3) Provide the comparative analyses, including the results of the
analyses, performed to determine the following:
(A) That the processes and strategies used to design each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for coverage of services
for treatment of a mental illness or substance abuse are
comparable to, and applied no more stringently than, the
processes and strategies used to design each nonquantitative
treatment limitation for coverage of services for treatment of
other medical or surgical conditions.
(B) That the processes and strategies used to apply each
nonquantitative treatment limitation for treatment of a mental
illness or substance abuse are comparable to, and applied no
more stringently than, the processes and strategies used to
apply each nonquantitative limitation for treatment of other
medical or surgical conditions.
(g) This subsection applies to an individual contract or a group
contract that is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after
June 30, 2026. An individual contract or a group contract that
provides coverage of services for treatment of a mental illness or
substance abuse shall reimburse providers of mental illness or
substance abuse services at rates that are at least as favorable
relative to Medicare rates as reimbursement rates are for
providers of medical or surgical services relative to Medicare rates
in the respective classification of benefits.
(g) (h) The department shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with
this section and the applicable provisions of the act.
SECTION 12. IC 27-13-36-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) This section applies if:
(1) a health maintenance organization provides coverage for
mental and behavioral care services;
(2) network access to the mental and behavioral care services
does not meet reasonable appointment wait time standards;
and
(3) the enrollee receives care from an out of network provider.
(b) The enrollee's treating provider may collect from the
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


enrollee only the deductible or copayment, if any, that the enrollee
would be responsible to pay if the mental and behavioral care
services had been provided by a participating provider.
(c) The enrollee may not be billed by the health maintenance
organization or by the out of network provider for any difference
between the out of network provider's charge and the amount paid
by the health maintenance organization to the out of network
provider.
SECTION 13. IC 27-13-36.2-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. Section 4.7 of this chapter, as
added in the 2026 session of the general assembly, and section 8 of
this chapter, as amended in the 2026 session of the general
assembly, apply to an individual contract and a group contract that
is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2026.
SECTION 14. IC 27-13-36.2-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. (a) A health maintenance
organization may not retroactively reduce the reimbursement rate
for any CPT code (as defined in IC 27-1-37.5-3).
(b) A health maintenance organization:
(1) shall provide at least sixty (60) days notice to a provider;
and
(2) must obtain the approval and signature of a provider in
accordance with IC 27-1-37.1-5.5;
before reducing the reimbursement rate for any CPT code (as
defined in IC 27-1-37.5-3).
SECTION 15. IC 27-13-36.2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.55-2006,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A health maintenance organization may not,
more than two (2) years after the date on which an overpayment on a
provider claim was made to the provider by the health maintenance
organization:
(1) request that the provider repay the overpayment; or
(2) adjust a subsequent claim filed by the provider as a method of
obtaining reimbursement of the overpayment from the provider.
(a) A health maintenance organization may not retroactively
audit a paid claim or seek recoupment or a refund of a paid claim
more than:
(1) one hundred eighty (180) days after the date on which the
claim was initially paid; or
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141


(2) the same number of days that a provider is required to
submit a claim to the health maintenance organization;
whichever occurs first.
(b) A health maintenance organization may not be required to
correct a payment error to a provider more than two (2) years after the
date on which a payment on a provider claim was made to the provider
by the health maintenance organization. period described in
subsection (a).
(c) This section does not apply in cases of fraud by the provider, the
enrollee, or the health maintenance organization with respect to the
claim on which the overpayment or underpayment was made.
2026 IN 1201—LS 6817/DI 141